da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Bevægelighed og mobilitet > Møbler og armaturer til mobilitetsudstyr > Brusebænke og -stole: Brusebænke med polstring; Brusebænke; Brusestole; Overførselsbænke; Vægmonterede brusestole
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Sản phẩm hỗ trợ khả năng di chuyển và tiếp cận > Trang thiết bị hỗ trợ người khuyết tật > Ghế dùng trong phòng tắm: Ghế tắm có đệm; Ghế dài phòng tắm; Ghế tắm; Ghế hỗ trợ đi lại; Ghế tắm gắn tường
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Mobilitet og tilgjengelighet > Tilgjengelighetsmøbler og -utstyr > Dusjbenker og -stoler: Dusjbenker med pute; Dusjbenker; Dusjstoler; Overføringsbenker; Veggmonterte dusjstoler
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Mobilità e accessibilità > Mobili e impianti per accessibilità > Sedie e panche per doccia: Panche per doccia imbottite; Sedie per doccia; Sedute per doccia; Panche di trasferimento; Sedute per doccia a parete
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Mobility & Accessibility > Accessibility Furniture & Fixtures > Shower Benches & Seats: Padded Shower Benches; Shower Benches; Shower Seats; Transfer Benches; Wall-Mounted Shower Seats
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Rörlighet och tillgänglighet > Möbler och inredning för tillgänglighet > Duschbänkar och -säten: Vadderade duschbänkar; Duschbänkar; Duschsäten; Överföringsbänkar; Väggmonterade duschsäten
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Mobilité et accessibilité > Meubles et supports d’accessibilité > Bancs et sièges de douche: Bancs de douche rembourrés; Bancs de douche; Sièges de douche; Bancs de transfert; Sièges de douche muraux
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Movilidad y accesibilidad > Accesorios y muebles adaptados > Asientos y bancos para duchas: Asientos de ducha acolchados; Asientos de ducha; Bancos de ducha; Bancos de transferencia; Bancos de ducha de pared
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > Mobilite ve Kolay Erişim > Kolay Erişim Mobilya ve Demirbaşları > Banyo Tabureleri ve Sandalyeleri: Yastıklı Duş Bankları; Duş Bankları; Duş Sandalyeleri; Transfer Bankları; Duvara Monte Duş Sandalyeleri
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Κινητικότητα & προσβασιμότητα > Έπιπλα & εξαρτήματα προσβασιμότητας > Πάγκοι & καθίσματα μπάνιου: Επενδυμένοι πάγκοι μπάνιου; Πάγκοι μπάνιου; Καθίσματα ντους; Πάγκοι μεταφοράς; Επιτοίχια καθίσματα ντους
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Обеспечения мобильности людей > Мебель и приспособления для маломобильных людей > Скамьи и сиденья для душа: Мягкие скамьи для душа; Скамьи для душа; Сиденья для душа; Переносные скамьи; Сиденья для душа с креплением к стене
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Senioren- & Behindertenbedarf > Behindertengerechte Möbel & Vorrichtungen > Duschbänke & -sitze: Gepolsterte Duschbänke; Duschbänke; Duschsitze; Badewannen-Transferbänke; Duschklappsitz
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 移動補助具・生活補助具 > 生活補助用家具・取付金具 > 浴室用椅子: パッド入り浴室用椅子; 浴室用椅子; シャワーシート; 移乗ベンチ; 壁掛けシャワーシート
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Artykuły dla osób mających trudności z poruszaniem się > Meble i armatura ułatwiające poruszanie się > Ławki i siedziska prysznicowe: Wyściełane ławki prysznicowe; Ławki prysznicowe; Siedziska prysznicowe; Ławki transferowe; Naścienne siedziska prysznicowe
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Mobiliteit en toegankelijkheid > Meubelen en steunen voor toegankelijkheid > Douchebanken en -stoelen: Gewatteerde douchebanken; Douchebanken; Douchestoelen; Transferbanken; Wandgemonteerde douchestoelen
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Mobilita a dostupnosť > Bezbariérový nábytok a príslušenstvo > Lavice a sedadlá do sprchy: Polstrované lavice do sprchy; Lavice do sprchy; Sedadlá do sprchy; Prenosové lavice; Nástenné sedadlá do sprchy
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Mobilitate și accesibilitate > Mobilier și accesorii pentru accesibilitate > Bănci și scaune de duș: Bănci capitonate pentru duș; Bănci de duș; Scaune de duș; Bănci pentru transfer; Scaune de duș montate pe perete
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 이동/사용 편의 > 사용 편의용 가구/설비 > 욕실 벤치/의자: 푹신한 욕실 벤치; 욕실 벤치; 욕실 의자; 이동용 벤치; 벽설치식 욕실 의자
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Mobilnost in dostopnost > Pohištvo in oprema za osebe s posebnimi potrebami > Klopi in sedeži za prho: Oblazinjene klopi za prho; Klopi za prho; Sedeži za prho; Klopi za prenašanje; Stenski sedeži za prho
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 无障碍与移动辅助用品 > 无障碍家具及附属装置 > 沐浴椅/凳: 带衬垫的沐浴椅; 沐浴椅; 沐浴凳; 转移椅; 壁挂式沐浴凳
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Omezená pohyblivost a bezbariérový přístup > Nábytek a příslušenství pro osoby s handicapem > Lavice a sedátka do sprchy: Polstrované lavice do sprchy; Lavice do sprchy; Sedátka do sprchy; Převozní lavice; Nástěnná sprchová sedátka
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Мобилност и помощни средства > Помощни мебели и стойки за захват > Пейки и седалки за душ: Подплатени пейки за душ; Пейки за душ; Седалки за душ; Пейки за преместване; Стенни седалки за душ
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Liikkuminen ja esteettömyys > Apukalusteet ja tuet > Suihkutuolit ja -istuimet: Pehmustetut suihkutuolit; Suihkutuolit; Suihkuistuimet; Siirtoistuimet; Seinään asennettavat suihkuistuimet
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Mobilumas ir pritaikymas neįgaliesiems > Pritaikymo neįgaliesiems baldai ir instaliacijos > Dušo suolai ir sėdynės: Paminkštinti dušo suolai; Dušo suolai; Dušo sėdynės; Perkėlimo suolai; Sieninės dušo sėdynės
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 無障礙行動力 > 無障礙家具和設備 > 沐浴椅: 加墊沐浴椅; 沐浴長椅; 淋浴座椅; 浴缸轉位椅; 壁掛式淋浴座椅
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Mobilidade e acessibilidade > Móveis e utensílios de acessibilidade > Bancos e assentos para banho: Bancos para banho acolchoados; Bancos para banho; Assentos para banho; Bancos de transferência; Assentos para banho montados na parede
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Mobilitás és hozzáférhetőség > Kisegítő bútorok és berendezési tárgyak > Zuhanypadok és -ülések: Párnázott zuhanypadok; Zuhanypadok; Zuhanyülések; Transzferpadok; Falra szerelhető zuhanyülések
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Mobilidade e acessibilidade > Fixações e mobiliário de acessibilidade > Bancadas e assentos de duche: Bancos de duche almofadados; Bancos de duche; Assentos de duche; Bancos de transferência; Assentos de duche montados na parede
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > การเคลื่อนไหวและการเข้าถึง > เฟอร์นิเจอร์และเครื่องเรือนสำหรับการเข้าถึงพิเศษ > ที่นั่งอาบน้ำ: เบาะนั่งอาบน้ำ; ม้านั่งอาบน้ำ; เก้าอี้นั่งอาบน้ำ; ม้านั่งสำหรับเข้าออกอ่างอาบน้ำ; เก้าอี้นั่งอาบน้ำติดผนัง
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Mobilnost i pristupačnost > Namještaj i instalacije za pristupačnost > Tuš klupe i sjedala: Podstavljene tuš klupe; Tuš klupe; Sjedala za tuš; Klupe za prijelaz; Zidne sjedalice za tuš